Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 3. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 08.29.200.
Confidentiality of communications.

A person licensed under this chapter may not reveal to another person a communication made to the licensee by a client about a matter concerning which the client has employed the licensee in a professional capacity. This section does not apply to

a communication to a potential victim, the family of a potential victim, law enforcement authorities, or other appropriate authorities concerning a clear and immediate probability of physical harm to the client, other individuals, or society;

a case conference or case consultation with other mental health professionals at which the patient is not identified;

the release of information that the client in writing authorized the licensee to reveal;

information released to the board during the investigation of a complaint or as part of a disciplinary or other proceeding; or

situations where the rules of evidence applicable to the psychotherapist-patient privilege allow the release of the information.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a person licensed under this chapter shall report incidents of

child abuse or neglect as required by AS 47.17;

harm or assaults suffered by a vulnerable adult as required by AS 47.24.

Information obtained by the board under (a)(4) of this section is confidential and is not a public record for purposes of AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 71 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.110

—

40.25.140

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.110 —

09.25.140

.

Sec. 08.29.210.
Supervisor certification.

The board shall approve and certify a person as an approved counselor supervisor for the purposes of this chapter if the person

is licensed as a professional counselor or is a licensed physician, licensed advanced practice registered nurse who is certified to provide psychiatric or mental health services, licensed clinical social worker, licensed marital and family therapist, licensed psychologist, or licensed psychological associate;

submits an application for certification and the appropriate fee;

has five years of counseling experience;

provides to the board for its approval or disapproval a statement that details the person’s supervision philosophy, orientation, and experience; and

meets other criteria that may be established by the board in regulations.

Certification under (a) of this section remains in effect, without the need for renewal of the certification, until the person’s professional licensure is revoked, suspended, or otherwise lapses.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1998; am § 5 ch 49 SLA 1999; am § 3 ch 12 SLA 2002; am § 2 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For supervision, see 12 AAC 62, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (a)(1), substituted “practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner”.

Sec. 08.29.220.
Disclosure statement.

A client may not be charged a fee for professional counseling services unless, before the performance of the services, the client was furnished a copy of a professional disclosure statement that contained

the name, title, business address, and business telephone number of the professional counselor;

a description of the formal professional education of the professional counselor, including the institutions attended and the degrees received from them;

the professional counselor’s areas of specialization and the services available;

the professional counselor’s fee schedule listed by type of service or hourly rate;

at the bottom of the first page of the statement, the following sentence: “This information is required by the Board of Professional Counselors which regulates all licensed professional counselors,” followed by the name, address, and telephone number of the board’s office.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.29.230.
Limitation of practice.

Notwithstanding that a specific act is within the definition of the “practice of professional counseling,” a person licensed under this chapter may not perform the act if the person lacks appropriate education or training related to the act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 75 SLA 1998)